Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [216B.076] SMART METER GATEWAY DEVICE; CONSENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Electric utility" has the meaning given in section 216B.38, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin (c) "Smart meter gateway device" means any electric utility meter, electric utility meter component, electric utility load control device, or device ancillary to the electric utility meter that is located at an end user's residence or business and: (1) serves as a communications gateway or portal to electrical appliances, electrical equipment, or electrical devices within the end user's residence or business; or (2) otherwise communicates with, monitors, or controls electrical appliances, electrical equipment, or electrical devices within the end user's residence or business. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Property owner consent required. new text end new text begin (a) An electric utility that sells or provides electricity in Minnesota is prohibited from installing a smart meter gateway device on or in a person's home or business without the written consent of the person who owns the home or business. new text end new text begin (b) An electric utility must create a form that the person who owns the home or business must sign to opt in to having a smart meter gateway device installed on or in the person's home or business. The form must be in 12-point, boldface type and state that: new text end new text begin (1) the opt-in is optional and the person's service is not affected if the person does not opt in; and new text end new text begin (2) the device is a smart meter gateway device, and include the definition in subdivision 1, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Smart meter gateway device; disclosure. new text end new text begin When an electric utility enrolls a homeowner or business owner for electrical service at the person's home or business, the electric utility must: (1) disclose in writing whether a smart meter gateway device has been installed; and (2) upon written request of the homeowner or business owner, remove or allow the removal of all smart meter gateway devices. new text end